tables/uk-eu.utb
base uppercase \x0391 \x03b1   # Α
base uppercase \x0392 \x03b2   # Β
base uppercase \x0393 \x03b3   # Γ
base uppercase \x0394 \x03b4   # Δ
base uppercase \x0395 \x03b5   # Ε
base uppercase \x0396 \x03b6   # Ζ
base uppercase \x0397 \x03b7   # Η
base uppercase \x0398 \x03b8   # Θ
base uppercase \x0399 \x03b9   # Ι
base uppercase \x039a \x03ba   # Κ
base uppercase \x039b \x03bb   # Λ
base uppercase \x039c \x03bc   # Μ
base uppercase \x039d \x03bd   # Ν
base uppercase \x039e \x03be   # Ξ
base uppercase \x039f \x03bf   # Ο
base uppercase \x03a0 \x03c0   # Π
base uppercase \x03a1 \x03c1   # Ρ
base uppercase \x03a3 \x03c3   # Σ
base uppercase \x03a4 \x03c4   # Τ
base uppercase \x03a5 \x03c5   # Υ
base uppercase \x03a6 \x03c6   # Φ
base uppercase \x03a7 \x03c7   # Χ
base uppercase \x03a8 \x03c8   # Ψ
base uppercase \x03a9 \x03c9   # Ω
base uppercase \x0386 \x03ac   # Ά
base uppercase \x0388 \x03ad   # Έ
base uppercase \x0389 \x03ae   # Ή
base uppercase \x038a \x03af   # Ί
base uppercase \x038c \x03cc   # Ό
base uppercase \x038e \x03cd   # Ύ
base uppercase \x038f \x03ce   # Ώ
base uppercase \x03aa \x03ca   # Ϊ
base uppercase \x03ab \x03cb   # Ϋ

# =====================================================================
#  NUMBERS & QUOTES
# =====================================================================

# Number sign 3456 is written before every number (numeric mode).
# A comma inside a number keeps numeric mode: 3,14 = 3456-14-2-1-145
midendnumericmodechars ,
midnum , 2
midnum . 256

# Dot 5 separates a number from a following letter а-ж / a-j (5а, 3b)
nonumsign 5
numericnocontchars abcdefghij
numericnocontchars \x0430\x0431\x0446\x0434\x0435\x0444\x0433\x0445\x0438\x0436

# Single curly quotes/apostrophes become the apostrophe (dots 3)
noback correct "\x2018" "'"
noback correct "\x2019" "'"

# =====================================================================
#  CAPITALIZATION
# =====================================================================

capsletter 45           # capital letter sign
begcapsword 45-45       # capital word sign
capsnocont

# =====================================================================
#  STRESS MARK (U+0301) - placed BEFORE the letter
# =====================================================================

noback always \x0430\x0301 4-1        # а́
noback always \x0435\x0301 4-15       # е́
noback always \x0454\x0301 4-345      # є́
noback always \x0438\x0301 4-24       # и́
noback always \x0456\x0301 4-13456    # і́
noback always \x0457\x0301 4-1456     # ї́
noback always \x043e\x0301 4-135      # о́
noback always \x0443\x0301 4-136      # у́
noback always \x044e\x0301 4-1256     # ю́
noback always \x044f\x0301 4-1246     # я́

noback always \x0410\x0301 45-4-1     # А́
noback always \x0415\x0301 45-4-15    # Е́
noback always \x0404\x0301 45-4-345   # Є́
noback always \x0418\x0301 45-4-24    # И́
noback always \x0406\x0301 45-4-13456 # І́
noback always \x0407\x0301 45-4-1456  # Ї́
noback always \x041e\x0301 45-4-135   # О́
noback always \x0423\x0301 45-4-136   # У́
noback always \x042e\x0301 45-4-1256  # Ю́
noback always \x042f\x0301 45-4-1246  # Я́

# Standard tables at the end
include braille-patterns.cti
include IPA-unicode-range.uti
